Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2303
Incorporation; procedure; application; approval.

Whenever any number of natural persons, not less than three, each of whom shall be a duly qualified elector of and taxpayer in the local political subdivision, file with the governing body of any local political subdivision an application in writing seeking permission to apply for the incorporation of an industrial development board of the local political subdivision, the governing body shall proceed to consider the application. If the governing body, by appropriate resolution duly adopted, (1) finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary, or advisable that the corporation be formed, (2) authorizes the persons making the application to proceed to form the corporation, and (3) approves the form of the articles of incorporation proposed to be used in organizing the corporation, then the persons making the application shall execute, acknowledge, and file articles of incorporation for the corporation under the Nebraska Industrial Development Corporation Act. No corporation may be formed unless the application has first been filed with the governing body of the local political subdivision and the governing body has adopted a resolution pursuant to this section.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 3.